District of Columbia statutes.
50-1541.02

Scope.

Except as otherwise provided in § 50-1541.28, this chapter shall apply to any transaction, certificate of title, or record relating to a vessel, even if the transaction, certificate of title, or record was entered into or created before January 1, 2016.

History

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-215, § 3, 61 DCR 13083

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-215: Section 32 of D.C. Law 20-215 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2016.